Utah statutes.
11-3-4.   Enforcement -- Seizure of fireworks sold unlawfully -- Revocation
of license.
(1)  Each county and municipal officer charged with the enforcement of state
and municipal laws, including all fire enforcement officials and the State
Fire Marshal Division of the Department of Public Safety, shall enforce this
chapter and Sections 53-7-220 through 53-7-225, Utah Fireworks Act.
(2)  Any official charged with enforcing this chapter and the Utah Fireworks
Act may:
(a)  seize display fireworks, fireworks, and unclassified fireworks that are
offered for sale, sold, or in the possession of an individual in violation of
this chapter or the Utah Fireworks Act; and
(b)  recommend to the state fire marshall that each importer or wholesaler
selling or offering to sell display fireworks, fireworks, or unclassified
fireworks in violation of this chapter or the Utah Fireworks Act have his
license revoked.
